Illinois, session 104th, HB4720.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department Agriculture for the purpose of funding 7grants to emerging farmers for infrastructure, equipment, and 8market access. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.